West Virginia, session 2026, HB5558.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 30B. the West Virginia Child Investment Account Matching Program Act. §18-30B-1. Short Title. This article shall be known, and may be cited as, the "West Virginia Child Investment Account Matching Program Act". §18-30B-2. Definitions. For purposes of this article:"Eligible child" means a child born in West Virginia who is eligible for a federally established Trump Account pursuant to federal law."Matching contribution" means a contribution made by the state of West Virginia into a Trump Account pursuant to this article."Treasurer" means the West Virginia State Treasurer."Trump Account" means an investment or savings account established under federal law for the benefit of an eligible child. §18-30B-3. Creation of matching program. (a) Subject to appropriation by the Legislature, the Treasurer shall establish and administer a program to provide a one-time matching contribution to the Trump Account of each eligible child born in West Virginia.(b) The amount of the matching contribution may not exceed $250 per eligible child.(c) The Treasurer may establish income-based prioritization criteria, giving preference to households with incomes not exceeding three hundred percent of the federal poverty level.(d) The child must have an already established Trump Account through the existing federal program(e) The amount dispersed per year must not exceed $2.5 million annually. §18-30B-4. Administration. (a) The Treasurer may enter into agreements with federal agencies, financial institutions, or program administrators as necessary to implement this article.(b) The Treasurer shall establish verification procedures to confirm eligibility and prevent duplication of benefits. §18-30B-5. Rulemaking. The Treasurer may promulgate legislative rules in accordance with §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code to implement the provisions of this article. §18-30B-6. No entitlement. Nothing in this article creates an entitlement to a matching contribution, which shall be made solely at the discretion of the Legislature through appropriation.